Utah statutes.
78A-7-212.   Place of holding court.

(1) (a)  County justice court judges may hold court in any municipality within the precinct but may exercise only the jurisdiction provided by law for county justice courts.

(b)  County justice court judges may also, at the direction of the county legislative body, hold court anywhere in the county as needed but may only hear cases arising within the precinct.

(2)  A municipal justice court judge shall hold court in the municipality where the court is located and, as directed by the municipal governing body, at the county jail or municipal prison.

